District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Energy Efficiency Financing Debt Cap Temporary Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 202(a) of the Energy Efficiency Financing Act of 2010, effective May 27,
2010 (D.C. Law 18-183; D.C. Official Code § 8-1778.22(a)), is amended by striking the phrase “of
bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $250 million” and inserting the phrase “of
bonds” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code §1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2